Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2278
Nebraska Senior Companion Volunteer Program; eligible recipients.

The Nebraska Senior Companion Volunteer Program shall provide companion services to the frail elderly who (1) are bedfast or too frail or too ill to be transported to special programs, (2) have withdrawn from all social interaction or are confined due to psychological problems, or (3) desire but are unable to participate in adult day services programs because openings are unavailable.

Laws 2000, LB 1101, § 7.